Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,119.06
Nebraska State Fair contributions; disposition.

The Tax Commissioner shall determine the total amount of contributions designated pursuant to section 77-27,119.05 each year, and the State Treasurer shall transfer such amount from the General Fund to the State Fair Cash Fund.

Laws 2003, LB 72, § 3.